Idaho, session 2025, H0144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 36, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3622XX, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3622XX. SMALL SELLER. (1) There is hereby exempted from the taxes
imposed by this chapter sales of tangible personal property made by an in-
dividual making small sales. A small seller shall not collect or remit any
state sales or use tax imposed by this chapter.
(2) For purposes of this section, "small seller" means an Idaho resi-
dent making sales that do not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in cumu-
lative gross receipts in the current or previous calendar year. It shall not
include partnerships, corporations, or limited liability corporations.
(3) The exemption provided in this section shall not apply to:
(a) Sales of motor vehicles, trailers, all-terrain vehicles, utility
type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles, motorcycles intended
for off-road use, snowmobiles, aircraft, vessels as defined in section
67-7003, Idaho Code, alcohol, or tobacco; or
(b) Items purchased to be sold or incorporated into items to be sold.
(4) A small seller with gross receipts exceeding five thousand dollars
($5,000) shall within thirty (30) days file with the state tax commission
an application for a temporary seller's permit and begin collecting sales
and use tax. No temporary seller's permit shall be issued for a period of
time greater than the remaining calendar year in which sales exceeded five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for a small seller. The following year, such
seller shall apply for a seller's permit under the provisions of section
63-3620(a), Idaho Code.
(5) A small seller shall indicate on such seller's invoice, if re-
quested by the purchaser, that the sale was exempt from sales and use tax
pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(6) A small seller shall not permanently maintain, occupy, or use an
office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or
storage place, or other place of business or maintain a stock of goods with
anticipation of exceeding gross receipts of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(7) A small seller may file an application with the state tax commission
for a seller's permit pursuant to section 63-3620, Idaho Code, before such
seller reaches the five thousand dollar ($5,000) threshold provided in sub-
section (2) of this section.


(8) Nothing in this section relieves a small seller from filing indi-
vidual income tax returns for persons who meet the filing requirements under
section 63-3030, Idaho Code.
(9) A small seller with sales exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000)
annually shall keep such records for not less than four (4) years pursuant to
section 63-3624, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.